Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2116.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 704(a)(1) of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended to read:Section 704. Supplemental senior citizen tax reduction.(a) Eligibility.--Beginning in the first year in which a payment under section 505(b) is made and each year thereafter, the following apply:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any resident of a city of the first class, a city of the second class A or a resident of a school district of the first class A who is eligible to receive a property tax rebate under Chapter 13 [and has a household income, as defined under section 1303, equal to or less than $30,000] shall be eligible to receive an additional property tax rebate equal to 50% of the amount the individual is eligible to receive under Chapter 13.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1303.1. Income calculation.For the purposes of calculating income under this chapter, income shall be reduced by the face amount of property taxes paid by the claimant on the claimant's primary residence regardless of whether the taxes were paid in the discount, face or penalty period.Section 3. Section 1304 of the act is amended to read:Section 1304. Property tax; and rent rebate.(a) Schedule of rebates.--(1) (Reserved).(2) The following apply:(i) The base amount of any claim for property tax rebate for real property taxes due and payable during calendar year 2023 and thereafter shall be determined in accordance with the following schedule:Household IncomeAmount of Real Property TaxesAllowed as Rebate$ 0 - $ 8,000 $1,000 8,001 - 15,000 770 15,001 - 18,000 46020260HB2116PN2737 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 18,001 - 45,000 380(ii) [The] Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (5), the supplemental amount for a claimant with [a household income equal to or less than $30,000 and] an eligible claim for property tax rebate for real property taxes due and payable during the calendar year preceding the first year in which a payment under section 505(b) is made and each year thereafter and whose real property taxes exceed 15% of the claimant's household income shall be equal to 50% of the base amount determined under subparagraph (i). A claimant who is a resident of a city of the first class, a city of the second class A or a school district of the first class A shall be ineligible for the supplemental amount under this subparagraph.(3) The following apply:(i) The base amount of any claim for rent rebate in lieu of property taxes for rent due and payable during calendar year 2023 and thereafter shall be determined in accordance with the following:Household IncomeAmount of Rent Rebate inLieu of Property TaxesAllowed as Rebate$ 0 - $ 8,000 $1,000 8,001 - 15,000 770 15,001 - 18,000 460 18,001 - 45,000 380(ii) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (5), the supplemental amount for a claimant with an eligible claim for rent rebate in lieu of property taxes and whose gross rent actually paid exceeds 75% of the claimant's 20260HB2116PN2737 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 household income shall be equal to 50% of the base amount determined under subparagraph (i).(4) The household income limits contained in paragraphs (2)(i) and (ii) and (3) shall be increased by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers statistics published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. Any increase shall be rounded to the nearest $10. The percentage change shall be determined by comparison of the figure for the previous July, with that of the current July figure. If the Consumer Price Index declines for a given period, the household income limit shall be unchanged for that year. The secretary shall, within 10 days following the determination, transmit notice of the determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(5) The supplemental amount for a claimant with an eligible claim for both a property tax rebate and a rent rebate in lieu of property taxes whose combined total of real property taxes and one-fifth of gross rent actually paid exceeds 15% of the claimant's household income shall be equal to 50% of the base amount determined under paragraph (2)(ii). A claimant who is a resident of a city of the first class, a city of the second class A or a school district of the first class A shall be ineligible for the supplemental amount under this subparagraph.(b) Limitations on claims.--(1) No claim through calendar year 2005 shall be allowed if the amount of property tax or rent rebate computed in accordance with this section is less than $10, and the 20260HB2116PN2737 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maximum amount of property tax or rent rebate payable shall not exceed $500.(2) For calendar year 2006 and thereafter, the maximum amount of property tax or rent rebate in lieu of property taxes payable shall not exceed the lesser of:(i) the amount of a claim under subsection (a)(2) or (3);(ii) the amount of real property taxes actually paid; or(iii) 20% of gross rent actually paid.(3) No claim shall be allowed if the claimant is a tenant of an owner of real property exempt from real property taxes.(c) Apportionment [and public assistance].--(1) If any of the following exist relating to a claim:(i) a homestead is owned or rented and occupied for only a portion of a year or is owned or rented in part by a person who does not meet the qualifications for a claimant, exclusive of any interest owned or leased by a claimant's spouse;(ii) the claimant is a widow or widower who remarries; or(iii) the claimant is a formerly disabled person who is no longer disabled,the department shall apportion the real property taxes or rent in accordance with the period or degree of ownership or leasehold or eligibility of the claimant in determining the amount of rebate for which a claimant is eligible.[(2) A claimant who receives public assistance from the Department of Public Welfare shall not be eligible for rent 20260HB2116PN2737 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rebate in lieu of property taxes during those months within which the claimant receives public assistance.](d) Government subsidies.--Rent shall not include subsidies provided by or through a governmental agency.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2116PN2737 - 6 - 12345